Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 2 APPROPRIATION OF WATER — PERMITS, CERTIFICATES, AND LICENSES — SURVEY
§ 42-238. Well drillers’ licenses and operator permits.

The director of the department of water resources is hereby vested with the duties relating to the licensing of well drillers and operators of well drilling equipment as provided for in this act so as to protect the ground water resources against waste and contamination. Qualifications for well drillers and operators of well drilling equipment shall be adopted by rule of the water resource board.

It shall be unlawful for any person to drill a well in Idaho, including wells excepted under sections 42-227 and 42-228, Idaho Code, without first complying with the provisions of this chapter. It shall be unlawful for any person to abandon a well in Idaho without first obtaining a driller’s license or receiving a waiver of the license requirement from the director of the department of water resources. Authorization is required from the director prior to the abandonment and the person abandoning the well shall submit to the director a report describing the abandonment.

For the purpose of this act, a “person” shall be defined as any individual who drills or abandons any well for himself or another in this state; it shall also be defined as any firm, copartnership, corporation or association which drills or abandons, or contracts to drill or abandon any well for hire or otherwise in this state.

A driller’s license shall be obtained by filing with the director an application in writing on a form provided by the director accompanied by a two hundred dollar ($200) application fee.

The director shall require that an applicant for a driller’s license successfully pass a written or oral examination, and be required to submit references and other detailed information describing past drilling experience to allow the director to determine if the applicant is qualified to drill wells in the state.

The water resource board shall adopt rules for licensing and renewal of licenses of well drillers in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The board is authorized to adopt rules on professional responsibility and continuing education requirements, not to exceed twenty (20) hours during each licensing period. Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the director may refuse to issue or renew a driller’s license permanently or for a designated period of time if the driller has previously constructed wells improperly or constructed a well without a valid driller’s license. The rules may also allow for the director to issue a license with limitations on the type, size or depth of wells the applicant is authorized to construct. A copy of the proposed rules for licensing of well drillers shall be furnished to each well driller holding a current license at the time such proposed rules are promulgated or modified. The rules shall provide for the consideration of such factors as the applicant’s:

Knowledge of Idaho water laws and the rules of the water resource board in connection with the drilling of wells including proper well construction standards and procedures;

Knowledge of the various types of drilling tools and their use;

General knowledge of underground geology and ground water hydrology and their relation to well construction;

Ownership or access to equipment capable of adequately constructing a well;

Knowledge of types of well casing and their use;

Knowledge of special well drilling problems and their solution, including additional requirements for licensing for drillers who construct wells in areas of drilling concern or for the production of low temperature geothermal resources as defined in section 42-233, Idaho Code, and for the production of geothermal resources as provided in chapter 40, title 42, Idaho Code;

Previous drilling experience; and

History of compliance with well drilling laws and rules.

If it is determined that the applicant for a driller’s license is not qualified, the director shall deny the application. If it is determined that the applicant is qualified, a license shall be issued upon the filing with the director of a surety bond or cash bond in the penal sum of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) as determined by the director based on the applicant’s history of compliance with well drilling laws and rules, the size and depth of the wells the applicant proposes to drill, the complexity of the wells, the resource to be recovered, the area of operation of the applicant, and other relevant factors the director determines are in the public interest. The surety or cash bond shall be conditioned upon the proper compliance with the provisions of this chapter, chapter 40, title 42, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated pursuant thereto. Such bond shall be made payable to the director.

Employees of drilling firms, copartnerships, corporations or associations are authorized to operate drilling equipment for the driller after obtaining an operator’s permit from the director. Such employees shall be designated as operators.

A driller is responsible for adequate supervision of the operators during the construction of each well. A driller shall be responsible for the work of the operators employed by the driller.

An operator shall only operate drilling equipment for the driller listed on the operator’s permit.

An operator’s permit shall be obtained by filing with the director an application in writing on a form provided by the director accompanied by a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) application fee.

The applicant for an operator’s permit shall successfully complete a written or oral examination.

The water resource board shall adopt rules for the issuance, revocation and renewal of an operator’s permit in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The board is also authorized to adopt rules on professional responsibility and continuing education requirements not to exceed twenty (20) hours during each permitting period. The rules shall consider such factors as:

Knowledge of Idaho water laws and the rules of the water resource board in connection with the drilling of wells;

Demonstrated previous compliance with well drilling laws and rules including well construction standards; and

General understanding of well drilling equipment, well construction techniques, basic geology and map reading.

Driller’s licenses and operator’s permits issued under this section shall expire on March 31 in the second year after issuance or upon revocation of the license by the director as provided for in this act. The driller’s license can be renewed effective April 1 of every other year upon written application on forms provided by the director and the filing of a one hundred dollar ($100) renewal fee plus a fifteen dollar ($15.00) renewal fee for each operator employed by the licensed driller. Drillers renewing licenses in 1997 shall be assessed a licensing fee prorated monthly based upon the annual fee schedule. Thereafter, driller licenses and operator permits will be renewed upon expiration for a two (2) year period. Documents demonstrating compliance with the continuing education requirements of the rules shall be submitted to the director along with other license and permit renewal documents. The renewal request must be accompanied by a new bond or evidence that the previous bond is still in effect. The renewal may then be granted by the director if he determines that the driller or operator has complied with the rules promulgated pursuant to this act. The fees collected for the licensing of well drillers and permitting of operators are nonrefundable and shall be deposited in the water administration fund [account] with the state treasurer with other fees collected by the director.
(10) The licensed driller and permitted operators shall have a card on hand, provided by the director to indicate that the driller or operator is presently licensed or permitted at all times when he is operating the drilling equipment. The director may also require other identification to be posted on the drilling equipment as he deems helpful in the administration of this act.

(11) Well driller’s report. In order to enable a comprehensive survey of the extent and occurrence of the state’s ground water resource, every well driller is hereby required to keep available for inspection at the well site a daily well log and pertinent data concerning each well, and its construction or abandonment, that is constructed or abandoned under the driller’s direction in Idaho, including wells excepted under sections 42-227 and 42-228, Idaho Code, and complete a report on forms furnished by the director. These reports shall be properly prepared and signed by the driller and deposited with the director within thirty (30) days following the completion of the well. When the driller signs the report, the driller shall attest that all information on the report is accurate to the best of the driller’s knowledge and that the driller has met all minimum well construction standards, low temperature geothermal resource well construction standards, geothermal resource well construction standards and area of drilling concern standards as adopted by the water resource board. The reports shall become a permanent record in the office of the director for hydrologic and geologic analysis and research, and shall be available for public use. The report shall include such data as the director deems necessary to provide the information that will be valuable for future reference and study.

(12) Well construction standards. The water resource board shall adopt minimum standards for new well construction, modification and abandonment of existing wells, low temperature geothermal resource well construction and geothermal well construction in this state under the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Such standards shall require each well to be so constructed as to protect the ground water of the state from waste and contamination and may include additional requirements for wells drilled in “areas of drilling concern” as designated in accordance with subsection (15) of this section. Every licensed well driller will be furnished a copy of the adopted standards by the director, and will be required to construct or abandon each well in compliance with the adopted standards.

(13) Penalties for violation. Drilling of a well without first obtaining a license as required in this section shall be a criminal misdemeanor, and the employees of the department of water resources are hereby empowered to issue Idaho uniform citations, as provided by the rules of the court for magistrate’s division of the district court, to any person who drills a well without first obtaining the required license. When the director of the department of water resources determines that any person is in substantial violation of any provision of this section or any rule, permit, condition of approval or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this section, the director may commence an administrative enforcement action by issuing a written notice of violation in accordance with the provisions of section 42-1701B, Idaho Code. Failure of the driller to comply with the provisions of section 42-238(11), Idaho Code, will allow the director to proceed to collect the necessary data on the well or wells in any manner available to him, and the cost of this data collection may be charged against the driller’s bond in the amount of the expenses incurred up to the total amount of the bond.
(a) Failure of the driller to comply with the provisions of section 42-238(11), Idaho Code, is also cause for the director to revoke an active license, or refuse to renew a license, until such time as the well driller’s report or reports are properly completed and on file in the office of the director. If it is found that a driller has intentionally submitted inaccurate or false information in the signed well driller’s report as provided in subsection (11) of this section, or has failed to file a report within the time frame required, the driller shall be liable for a civil penalty as provided in section 42-1701B, Idaho Code. In addition, this shall be cause for the director to suspend an active license for a period not in excess of one (1) year or to not renew a license.

(b) Failure of the driller to comply with the provisions of section 42-238(12), Idaho Code, will allow the director to proceed to repair, reconstruct or abandon a well so that it complies with the adopted minimum standards of well construction and abandonment, and the costs of this work may be charged against the driller’s bond in the amount of the expenses incurred up to the total amount of the bond.

(c) Failure of the driller to comply with the provisions of section 42-238(12), Idaho Code, is also cause for the director to revoke an active license or refuse to renew a license until such time as the well driller has repaired or reconstructed the well or wells so that they meet the adopted minimum standards. Any driller, well owner or well pump installer causing a well to be altered or modified so as to not meet the construction standards provided for under this section, shall be deemed to have violated the provisions of this section and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions of section 42-1701B, Idaho Code. The director may also require that the well driller present evidence to show that he and his equipment are now capable of constructing a well in a proper manner, before the license is renewed.

(14) Appeals. Refusal to issue, refusal to renew, or revocation of a well driller’s license or operator’s permit by the director shall be cause for the well driller to seek a public hearing before the water resource board. No formal petition shall be required from the affected driller or operator, but a simple statement, in writing, requesting a hearing shall be sufficient. The board shall notify the driller or operator, and the director, of the date set for the hearing, which shall be at least fifteen (15) days after the notice is sent by certified mail to the well driller or operator at his address of record with the department. A certified transcript of the proceedings and the evidence received at such hearing shall be maintained by the board. The board shall affirm, modify or reject the director’s decision, and make its decision in the form of an order to the director. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and rules of practice and procedure adopted by the water resource board. Any party to the hearing may seek judicial review of any final order of the water resource board pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

(15) Drilling in a designated “area of drilling concern.” The director of the department of water resources may designate as he determines necessary, “areas of drilling concern” on an aquifer by aquifer basis within which drillers must comply with the additional requirements of this section. The director shall designate “areas of drilling concern” to protect public health and to prevent waste or contamination of ground or surface water because of factors such as aquifer pressure, vertical depth of the aquifer, warm or hot ground water, or contaminated ground or surface waters. It is unlawful for any person not meeting the requirements of this subsection to drill a well for any purpose in a designated “area of drilling concern.” Any person drilling a new well or deepening or modifying an existing well for any purpose in an “area of drilling concern” as designated by the director as herein provided shall comply with the following additional requirements:
(a) Additional bonding requirements, as determined by the director, to insure that the well is constructed or abandoned in compliance with the adopted standards for well construction.

(b) Additional experience and knowledge in drilling wells encountering warm water or pressurized aquifers as required by rules adopted by the water resource board.

(c) Document that specialized equipment needed to drill wells in “areas of drilling concern,” as determined by the director, is or will be available to the driller.

(d) Provide a notice of intent to drill, deepen or modify a well, submit plans and specifications for the well and a description of the drilling methods that will be used, as required by the director, and receive the written approval of the director before commencing to drill, deepen, or modify any well in a designated “area of drilling concern.”

Prior to designating an “area of drilling concern,” the director shall conduct a public hearing in or near the area to determine the public interest concerning the designation. Notice of the hearing shall be published in two (2) consecutive weekly issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the area prior to the date set for hearing.

In the event an area has been designated as an “area of drilling concern” and the director of the department of water resources desires to remove such designation or modify the boundaries thereof, he shall likewise conduct a public hearing following similar publication of notice prior to taking such action.

§ 42-238a. Water administration account.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special account known as the water administration account. All fees and other moneys collected by the director of the department of water resources pursuant to sections 42-221, 42-237g, 42-238, 42-1713, 42-3905, 42-4003, and 42-4011, Idaho Code, shall be deposited in the water administration account. All moneys deposited in the water administration account are hereby appropriated to the director for the purpose of the administration of the provisions of title 42, Idaho Code, and no moneys received in the account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer unless the voucher for such disbursement contains the certificate of the director that such voucher is for an expense incurred in the administration of the provisions of title 42, Idaho Code.

§ 42-238b. Certain proceedings regarding the rights to the use of ground water.

All proceedings commenced prior to July 1, 1951, for the acquisition of the rights to the use of ground water may be so commenced and such rights may be acquired and perfected under chapter 2 of title 42, Idaho Code, unaffected by this chapter or by chapter 200, laws of 1951.

§ 42-239. Interpretation.

The executive and judicial departments of the state shall construe the provisions of this act, wherever possible in harmony with the provisions of title 42, Idaho Code, as amended; and nothing herein shall be construed contrary to or in conflict with the provisions of article XV of the Constitution; and except where otherwise provided in this act, the provisions of said title 42, Idaho Code, as amended, shall continue to govern ground water rights in this state.

§ 42-240. Application for right to exchange water — Filing fee — Notice — Protest — Hearing — Approval or denial — Appeal.

Any person holding a right for the use of surface water may make application to the director of the department of water resources to exchange water authorized to be diverted under the right with the same or a different source, or with water authorized to be diverted under one (1) or more other rights from the same source or another surface water source. If the application proposes an exchange with water under another water right, the application shall be accompanied by an agreement in writing subscribed by the person proposing the exchange and each person or organization owning rights to water with whom the exchange is proposed to be made.

The application shall be upon forms furnished by the department and shall contain such information as shall enable the director to determine the nature of the proposed exchange, and shall be accompanied by the statutory filing fee provided under section 42-221, Idaho Code, for an application to change a vested water right.

Upon receipt of the application, it shall be the duty of the director to examine the same and, if otherwise proper, to cause notice of the proposed exchange to be published in the same manner as applications under section 42-203A, Idaho Code. The notice shall fully describe the nature of the proposed exchange of water and shall advise that anyone who wishes to protest shall file notice of protest in accordance with the provisions of section 42-203A, Idaho Code.

Upon the receipt of any protest it shall be the duty of the director to investigate the same and to conduct a hearing thereon. The director shall also advise the watermaster of the district in which the exchange is proposed, if a district exists, and the watermaster shall notify the director of the watermaster’s recommendations on the application. The director shall not take final action on the application or exchange until the director has received the recommendations of the watermaster, including recommended conditions necessary for the exchange of water to be properly administered and regulated.

The director shall examine all the evidence and available information and shall approve the exchange in whole, or in part, or upon conditions, provided no other water rights are injured thereby, the exchange does not constitute an enlargement in use of the original right or rights, the exchange is consistent with the conservation of water resources within the state of Idaho, the exchange is in the local public interest as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, and the exchange will not adversely affect the local economy of the watershed or local area within which the source of water for the proposed use originates, in the case where the place of use is outside of the watershed or local area where the source of water originates. Unless otherwise provided in a written agreement between the applicant and other right holders, the director shall condition approval of an exchange so that the exchange will not be operative during times when water is not available to satisfy the exchange, and that during these times the right to use water automatically reverts to the place of use authorized under the water rights. A copy of the approved application for exchange shall be provided to the applicant and the watermaster, and the applicant shall be authorized upon receipt thereof to make the exchange in accordance with the conditions set forth by the director. Should an approved exchange thereafter be discontinued, the applicant or the applicant’s successor in interest must so notify the director and the district watermaster.
(6) In the absence of a contrary agreement by the parties to an exchange, when the director has approved a right to exchange storage water for the natural flow of a stream or other water supply, the storage water shall be delivered in preference to any exchange rights subsequently approved using the same storage water right.

(7) Any person or persons feeling themselves aggrieved by a final order or final action of the director under this section may, if a protest was filed and hearing held thereon, seek judicial review pursuant to section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code. If no protest was filed and no hearing held, the applicant may request a hearing pursuant to section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code, for the purpose of contesting the action of the director and may seek judicial review of the final order of the director following the hearing pursuant to section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code.

§ 42-241. Purpose.

The future growth and development of the state is dependent upon effective management and efficient use of the state’s water resources. The purpose of this act is to provide adequate records of water right claims for efficient administration and to aid in the proper planning for the future use of the state’s water resources.

§ 42-242. Definitions.

Whenever used in this act, the terms:

“Person” shall mean an individual, partnership, association, public or private corporation, city or other municipality, county, state agency, or the state of Idaho, and the United States of America when claiming water rights established under the laws of the state of Idaho.

“Notice in writing” means a notice substantially in the following form:

§ 42-243. Filing of claims of rights established by diversion and use — Form and content of claim.

In order to allow for the recording of historic uses of the waters of this state, any person using or claiming rights to the use of water for uses other than domestic purposes, which have heretofore been established by diversion and application to a beneficial use shall file a claim of such right with the department of water resources not later than June 30, 1983, or if mailed, shall be postmarked not later than June 30, 1983. Such claim shall be in affidavit form on forms furnished by the department of water resources and shall set forth:

a. The name and post-office address of the claimant.

b. The quantity of water claimed to have been used.

c. The source of the water supply.

d. The location of the point or points of diversion.

e. The nature of the use and the period during each year when the water is used for such purposes.

f. The priority of the right claimed which shall be determined by the date when the water was first applied to a beneficial use provided there has been no period of abandonment or nonuse or forfeiture of the water right since that date.

g. If water is claimed for irrigation, the legal description of the lands irrigated.

h. Such other information as shall be required by the blank form furnished by the department.

Such claim may be accompanied by maps showing the place of use, affidavits of witnesses familiar with the uses claimed, measurements of the water diverted and used, and such other information as the claimant may wish to submit.

If the claim is filed with the department of water resources later than June 30, 1983, or if it is mailed to the department of water resources and the postmark is later than June 30, 1983, the claim shall be classified as follows:

a. If the only use identified on the claim is domestic purposes, then the claim will be considered to be filed in a timely manner.

b. If the use(s) identified on the claim includes other than domestic purposes, then the claim shall be considered to be a late claim, with a unique filing fee as set forth in section 42-221, Idaho Code.

This section shall not apply to any water rights which are based on the authority of a permit or license issued by the department of water resources or one of its predecessors or water rights which have previously been adjudicated by a court having jurisdiction of such matters.

§ 42-244. Recording of claims by department — Corrections.

Upon receipt of any claim submitted under this chapter, together with the statutory filing fee as set forth in section 42-221, Idaho Code, it shall be the duty of the department of water resources to file and to maintain a record of such claim, which shall be available for public inspection during all normal office hours. The department shall also cause a notice to be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published and of general circulation in the county where the water is claimed to be diverted, if there is such a newspaper, otherwise in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, which said notice shall set forth such information as shall apprise the public of the nature of the claim which has been filed. At any time after the filing of a claim under the previous section, any person who disagrees that a right has been established as set forth in said claim may file an exception thereto in duplicate, in affidavit form, accompanied by such proof as said person deems appropriate. An exception filed shall be made a part of the file of the claim in the department of water resources and shall be considered the same as other evidence in said file. A copy of an exception filed shall be forwarded to the claimant by the department of water resources. Such claims may be corrected by the claimant only by filing of an amended claim in the same form as the original, which shall be recorded and numbered by the department the same as the original, and for which no additional filing fees shall be required.

§ 42-245. Failure to file claim waives and relinquishes right.

Any person claiming the right to divert or withdraw and use waters of the state who fails to file a claim as provided in section 42-243, Idaho Code, shall be conclusively deemed to have waived and relinquished any right, title or interest in said right.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if a claim to the right is filed in a general water rights adjudication proceeding commenced under the provisions of chapter 14, title 42, Idaho Code.

§ 42-246. Filing of claim not deemed adjudication of right — Evidence.

The filing of a claim does not constitute an adjudication of any claim to the right to use of waters as between the water use claimant and the state, or as between one (1) or more water use claimants and another or others. A statement of claim filed pursuant to section 42-243, Idaho Code, shall be admissible in a general adjudication of water rights as evidence of the times of use and the quantity of water the claimant was withdrawing or diverting as of the year of the filing, if, but only if, the quantities of water in use and the time of use when a controversy is mooted are substantially in accord with the times of use and quantity of water claimed in the claim. A claim shall not otherwise be evidence of the priority of the claimed water right.

§ 42-247. Notice of chapter provisions — How given — Requirements.

To ensure that all persons referred to in sections 42-242 and 42-243, Idaho Code, are notified of the provisions of this chapter, the department of water resources is directed to give notice of the provisions of this chapter as follows:

It shall cause a notice in writing to be placed in a prominent and conspicuous place in at least one (1) newspaper published and of general circulation in each county of the state, if there is such newspaper, otherwise in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, at least once each year for five (5) consecutive years.

It shall cause a notice substantially the same as a notice in writing to be broadcast by each commercial television station operating in the state, and by at least one (1) commercial radio station operating from each county of the state having such a station, regularly, at six (6) month intervals for five (5) consecutive years.

It shall cause a notice in writing to be placed in a prominent and conspicuous location in each county courthouse in the state.

The county treasurer of each county shall enclose with each mailing of one (1) or more statements of taxes due issued in 1981 a copy of a notice in writing and a declaration that it shall be the duty of the recipient of the statement of taxes due to forward the notice to the beneficial owner of the property. A sufficient number of copies of the notice and declaration shall be supplied to each county treasurer by the director of the department of water resources before the fifteenth day of January, 1981.

The director of the department may also in his discretion give notice in any other manner which will carry out the purposes of this section.

§ 42-248. Notification of change in ownership of a water right or change of address of a water right owner — Notice of action affecting a water right.

All persons owning or claiming ownership of a right to use the water of this state, whether the right is represented by decree of the court, by claim to a water right filed with the department of water resources or by permit or license issued by the director of the department of water resources, shall provide notice to the department of water resources of any change in ownership of any part of the water right or of any change in the owner’s mailing address, either of which occurs after June 30, 2000. Notice shall be provided within one hundred twenty (120) days of any change using forms acceptable to the director. Any notice received by the department of water resources more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the change in ownership or mailing address has occurred shall be accompanied by a late filing fee. The late filing fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100). The director may waive the late filing fee or a portion thereof for good cause.

All persons owning or claiming ownership of a right to use the water of this state that is evidenced by a water right recorded with the department of water resources prior to June 30, 2000, and for which a claim to water right, with current ownership and mailing address, is not on file with the department of water resources in the Snake River Basin Adjudication, Twin Falls Civil Case No. 39576, shall verify with the department that the ownership and mailing address information in the department’s records is correct. Any incorrect ownership or mailing address shall be corrected by the owner or claimant of the water right by July 1, 2002, using forms acceptable to the director. Any mailing address or ownership corrections required by this subsection received by the department of water resources after July 1, 2002, shall be subject to the late filing fee described in subsection (1) of this section. The director may waive the late filing fee or a portion thereof for good cause.

The director of the department of water resources will be deemed to have provided notice concerning any action by the director affecting a water right or claim if a notice of the action is mailed to the address and owner of the water right shown in the records of the department of water resources at the time of mailing the notice.

Compliance with section 42-1409(6), Idaho Code, shall be deemed to be compliance with this section. The filing of an application to change a water right under the provisions of section 42-211 or section 42-222, Idaho Code, showing a change in address of the owner of the right or accompanied by evidence documenting any change in ownership of the water right, shall be deemed compliance with this section. The fee requirements of this section shall apply in addition to the filing fee that may be required in connection with an application to change a water right under the provisions of section 42-211 or 42-222, Idaho Code.

A filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per right shall accompany a notice of change of ownership of a water right, provided that the fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per right if a request is made to change the department’s records to reflect a division in the ownership of the water right resulting from a division in the ownership of the place of use under the water right. A notice of change of ownership of all or part of a water right shall be accompanied by evidence showing the basis for the change in ownership, and how the right is divided if the change divides the right among multiple owners.
(6) Any person having a security interest in a water right and desiring to be notified by the department regarding the filing of a change in ownership of that water right or of any proposed or final action to amend, transfer or otherwise modify that water right shall make the request upon a form provided by the department accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per right. The request shall be accompanied by evidence of the security interest including the expiration date of the security interest or other date defining the end of the period for which notification is requested. The request for notification shall expire at the end of the requested notification period unless renewed on a form provided by the department and accompanied by a renewal fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per right. The holder of a security interest requesting notification under this subsection shall provide notice to the department within sixty (60) days if the security interest is terminated prior to the end of the requested notification period.

§ 42-249. [Reserved.]

The legislature finds that voluntary water conservation practices and projects can advance the policy of the state of Idaho to promote and encourage the conservation, development, augmentation and utilization of the water resources of this state. The legislature deems it appropriate, therefore, to encourage and support voluntary water conservation practices and projects.

For purposes of this section, “water conservation practice” means any practice, improvement, project or management program, that results in the diversion of less than the authorized quantity of water while maintaining the full beneficial use(s) authorized by the water right. Water conservation practices include, but are not limited to, practices that result in reductions in consumptive use as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, reductions in conveyance losses, and reductions in surface and seepage losses occurring at the place of use.

For the purposes of this section, “conserved water” means the quantity of water that is no longer diverted as a result of a water conservation practice. Conserved water shall not include quantities of water not diverted due to decreases in beneficial use.

§ 42-250. Water conservation.